Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Law No 5487-1 on Fundamentals of Russian Federation </F>
Legislation on Public Health Care signed by RF President B. 
Yeltsin on 22 Jul 93] 
  [Text]Whereby it is governed by the Constitution of the 
Russian Federation, universally recognized principles, and 
standards of international law, and 
  whereby it recognizes the fundamental role of public health 
care as an inalienable condition of life of society and confirm 
the responsibility of the State for safeguarding and improving 
the health of citizens of the Russian Federation, and 
  whereby it aims to improve legal regulation and secure the 
priority of human and citizen rights and freedoms in the field 
of health care, 
  the Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation hereby approves 
the Fundamentals of Legislation of the Russian Federation on 
Public Health. 
<H3>  Section I. General Statutes 
Article 1. Public health care </H3>
  Health care of citizens refers to the aggregate of 
political, 
economic, legal, social, cultural, scientific, medical, 
sanitary-hygienic and epidemic-control measures aimed at 
preservation and strengthening of the physical and mental health 
of everyone, maintaining a long active life, providing medical 
care in the event of illness. 
  The State guarantees health care for each individual in 
accordance with the Constitution of the Russian Federation and 
other legislative acts of the Russian Federation, Constitutions 
and other legislative acts of republics comprising the Russian 
Federation, universally recognized principles and standards of 
international rights, and international agreements of the 
Russian Federation. 
Article 2. Basic principles of public health care 
  The basic principles for public health care are: --1) 
adherence to human and citizen rights in the field of health 
care and provision of State guarantees related to these rights; 
--2) priority of preventive measures in the field of health 
care; --3) availability of sociomedical care; --4) social 
protection of citizens in the event of illness; --5) 
responsibility of State executive and administrative agencies, 
enterprises, institutions and organizations, regardless of 
nature of ownership, and officials for ensuring the rights of 
citizens in the field of health care. 
Article 3. Health care legislation of the Russian 
Federation 
  Legislation of the Russian Federation on public health care 
consists of relevant statutes in the Constitution of the Russian 
Federation and Constitution of republics comprising the Russian 
Federation, these Fundamentals and other legislative acts of the 
Russian Federation and republics of the Russian Federation 
passed in accordance with these fundamentals, as well as legal 
acts of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, oblasts, krays, 
the cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  These Fundamentals regulate the relations, in the field of 
public health care, of citizens, State executive and 
administrative agencies, business entities, individuals in 
State, municipal and private health care systems. 
  The legislative acts of republics of the Russian Federation, 
legal acts of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, 
oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg should not limit 
the rights of citizens in the field of health care established 
by the present Fundamentals. 
Article 4. Objectives of public health legislation of 
the Russian Federation 
  The object of legislation of the Russian Federation on 
public 
health care is to: --1) define the responsibility and competence 
of the Russian Federation, Russian Federation republics, 
autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of 
Moscow and St. Petersburg on questions of health care in 
accordance with the federal agreement, as well as to define the 
responsibility and competence of local self-government agencies 
in questions of public health care; --2) legally control 
activities in the field of public health of enterprises, 
institutions and organizations, regardless of nature of 
ownership, as well as State, municipal, and private health care 
systems; --3) define the rights of citizens and different 
population groups in matters of health care, and establish 
guarantees of their observance; --4) define the professional 
rights, duties and responsibility of medical and pharmaceutical 
workers, and establish guarantees of their social protection. 
<H3>  Section II. Competence in the Public Health Field of the 
Russian Federation, Republics of the Russian Federation, 
Autonomous Oblasts, Autonomous Okrugs, Krays, Oblasts, Cities of 
Moscow, St. Petersburg and Local Self-Government Agencies 
Article 5. Competence of the Russian Federation </H3>
  The following matters in the field of health care are within 
the purview of the Russian Federation, to: 
1) pass and change federal laws on health care and check their 
implementation 
2) protect human and citizen rights and freedoms in the field of 
health care 
3) establish bases of federal State policy in the field of 
public health, develop and implement federal programs for 
development of health care, disease prevention, medical care, 
medical education for the public and other issues in the field 
of public health care 
4) establish the structure of federal agencies that manage the 
State health care system, procedure for organizing them and 
activities 
5) define the share of health care expenses when setting up the 
republic budget of the Russian Federation, set up special funds 
for public health care, define taxation policy (including 
rebates on taxes, collections and other budgetary payments in 
the field of public health care 
6) manage natural resources, protect the environment, provide 
for ecological safety 
7) organize the State sanitation and epidemiological service of 
the Russian Federation, develop and pass federal sanitation 
rules and standards, and hygienic standards, provide for State 
sanitary and epidemiological oversight 
8) organize a system for sanitary protection of the territory of 
the Russian Federation 
9) implement measures directed toward saving human lives and 
safeguarding health in emergency situations, inform the public 
about circumstances in the zone of the emergency and steps taken 
10) provide a unified technical policy in the pharmaceutical and 
medical industry, approve State standards of the Russian 
Federation, engineering conditions in plants producing items for 
medical purposes, and organize oversight so that they are met 
11) certify (register, test and allow use of) drugs and 
disinfectants, immunobiological preparations and medical 
supplies, potent and toxic substances, narcotics, psychotropic 
agents, issue licenses for producing them, monitor their 
production, turnover and procedure for their use; certify 
products, work and services, issue permits for use of new 
medical technologies; 12) establish a unified federal system of 
statistical records and accounting in the field of health care; 
--14) develop common criteria and federal programs for training 
medical and pharmaceutical personnel, define the list of 
specialties in health care; establish basic preferential terms 
for medical and pharmaceutical personnel; 
13 ) establish standards for quality of medical care and monitor 
adherence to them; develop and approve a basic program of 
mandatory health insurance for citizens of the Russian 
Federation; establish insurance premiums for mandatory health 
insurance for citizens of the Russian Federation; establish 
preferential treatment of different population groups with 
respect to sociomedical care and drugs 
14) coordinate -- in the field of public, family, mother, 
father, and child care -- the work of State executive and 
administrative agencies, business entities, individuals in 
State, municipal and private health care systems; 
15) establish procedure for expert medical evaluations; 
16) establish procedure for licensing medical and pharmaceutical 
activities; --17) establish procedure to set up committees 
(commissions) dealing with ethics in the field of public health 
and their duties; 
18) coordinate research, finance federal research programs 
dealing with public health care; 
19) implement international collaboration of the Russian 
Federation and sign international agreements with the Russian 
Federation in the field of public health care. 
  Some of the authority in matters of public health care 
ascribed to the Russian Federation can be delegated to republics 
comprising the Russian Federation, autonomous oblasts, 
autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg as established in the Federative agreement on 
differentiation of management and authority of federal State 
agencies and agencies of sovereign republics of the Russian 
Federation, autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs of the Russian 
Federation, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg 
in the Russian Federation. 
Article 6. Competence of republics of the Russian 
Federation 
  The following matters in the field of health care are within 
the purview of republics of the Russian Federation, to: 

  -  1) pass legislative and other legal acts, monitor 
adherence to federal legislation, exercise legislative 
initiative in the field of public health care; 
  -  2) protect human and citizen rights and freedoms in the field 
of health care; 
  -  3) implement federal State policy in the field of public 
health 
care; define bases of State policy of republics of the Russian 
Federation in the field of public health care, execute federal 
programs for health care development; develop and execute 
republic-level programs to develop health care, disease 
prevention, medical care, medical education of the public and 
other matters in the field of public health care; 
  -  4) establish the structure of administrative agencies of the 
State health care system of republics of the Russian Federation, 
procedure for organizing them and their duties; develop a 
network of institutions in the State system of health care in 
republics of the Russian Federation; material and technical 
support of enterprises, institutions and organizations in the 
State health care system, monitor adherence to quality standards 
of medical care; 
  -  5) define the share of expenses for health care in setting up 
the republic-level budget of republics of the Russian 
Federation, set up special-purpose funds intended for public 
health care; approve programs of mandatory health insurance; 
establish additional preferential terms for some population 
groups with respect to sociomedical aid and drugs; 
  -  6) offer rebates on taxes, collections and other budgetary 
payments following established procedure for enterprises, 
institutions and organizations involved in public health care; 
  -  7) manage natural resources, protect the environment, provide 
for ecological safety; 
  -  8) protect the indigenous habitat and traditional lifestyle 
of 
small ethnic communities; 
  -  9) provide sanitary and epidemiological welfare and 
conditions 
for implementation of State sanitary and epidemiological 
oversight on the territory of Russian Federation republics; 
determine, for this purpose, the factors having an adverse 
effect on health of citizens, inform the public about them and 
implement measures to eliminate them, execute preventive, 
sanitary-hygienic, epidemic-control and environment-protective 
measures; 
  -  10) coordinate the work of State executive and administrative 
agencies, business entities, individuals in State, municipal and 
private health care systems in the field of public health care; 
family, mother, father, and child care, sanitary and hygienic 
education of the public; 
  -  11) implement measures directed toward saving human lives and 
safeguarding health in emergency situations, inform the public 
about circumstances in the zone of the emergency and steps 
taken; 
  -  12) issue permits for use of new methods of prevention, 
diagnosis and treatment, new medical technologies in republics 
of the Russian Federation; 
  -  13) organize and coordinate training of health care 
personnel, 
establish preferential terms for such personnel in addition to 
those adopted on the federal level; 
  -  14) license medical and pharmaceutical work, monitor 
performance of municipal licensing commissions; 
  -  15) coordinate research, finance republic programs of 
research 
in the field of citizen health care; 
  -  16) inform the public regularly, including the use of mass 
media, about the incidence of socially significant diseases and 
diseases presenting a danger to others; 
  -  17) implement international collaboration in the field of 
publichealth care; 
  -  18) deal with other issues in the field of public health care 
that are not within the purview of the Russian Federation. 
  Administrtive agencies of Russian Federation republics, by 
agreement with federal State agencies of the Russian Federation, 
can refer to the latter implementation of some of their powers 
in matters of public health care. 
  Article 7. Competence of autonomous oblasts, 
autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg 
  The following matters in the field of health care are within 
the purviewof autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, 
oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg, to: 

  -  1) pass legal acts, monitor adherence to federal 
legislation, exercise legislative initiative in the field of 
public health care; 
  -  2) protect human and citizen rights and freedoms in the field 
of health care; 
  -  3) implement State policy of the Russian Federation in the 
field of public health care; execute federal programs to develop 
health care; develop and execute regional programs for 
development of health care, disease prevention, rendering 
medical care, medical education of the public and other issues 
in the field of public health care; 
  -  4) set up administrative agencies of the State health care 
system of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, 
cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg; develop a network of 
institutions in State and municipal health care systems, as well 
as institutions of the system of social protection of the 
public; material and technical support of enterprises, 
institutions, and organizations in the State public health 
system; check adherence to quality standards of medical care; 
  -  5) define the share of expenses for public health in setting 
up 
their own budget, set up special-purpose funds earmarked for 
public health; finance and implement development of primary 
medical and health care pertaining to other forms of medical 
care and drugs; implement measures for health insurance; 
establish additional preferential terms for some population 
groups in rendering sociomedical aid and supplying drugs; 
  -  6) provide rebates on taxes, collections and other budgetary 
payments following established procedure for enterprises, 
institutions and organizations involved in public health care; 
  -  7) coordinate the work in the field of public health of State 
executive and administrative agencies, executives, individuals 
in the State, municipal and private health care systems; 
  -  8) protect the indigenous habitat and traditional lifestyle 
of 
small ethnic communities; 
  -  9) manage natural resources, protect the environment, provide 
for ecological safety 
  -  10) provide sanitary and epidemiological welfare and 
conditions 
for implementation of State sanitary and epidemiological 
oversight on subordinate territories; determine factors having 
an adverse effect on citizens' health, inform the public about 
them and carry out measures to eliminate them, implement 
preventive, sanitary-hygienic, epidemic-control and 
environment-protective measures; 
  -  11) protect families, mothers, fathers and children; educate 
the public in sanitation and hygiene; 
  -  12) execute measures to save human lives and protect them in 
emergency situations, inform the public about conditions in the 
zone of the emergency and steps taken; 
  -  13) license medical and pharmaceutical work, monitor 
performance of municipal licensing commissions; 
  -  14) organize and coordinate training of health care 
personnel; 
  -  15) inform the public regularly, including use of mass media, 
about the incidence of socially significant diseases and 
diseases presenting a danger to others; 
  -  16) implement international collaboration in the field of 
public health care; 
  -  17) deal with other issues in the field of public health care 
that are not within the purview of the Russian Federation. State 
agencies of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, 
oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg, by agreement with 
federal State agencies of the Russian Federation, can refer to 
the latter implementation of some of their authority in matters 
of public health care. 
  Article 8. Competence of local self-government 
agencies 
  The following matters in the field of health care are within 
the purview of local self-government agencies, to: 

  -  1) check adherence to legislation in the field of public 
health care; 
  -  2) protect human and citizen rights and freedoms in the field 
of health care; 
  -  3) set up administrative agencies in the municipal health 
care 
system, develop a network of institutions in the municipal 
health care system, define the nature and scope of their work; 
create conditions for development of a private health care 
system; organize primary medical-sanitary and other types of 
sociomedical aid, make it accessible, check adherence to quality 
standards of medical care, provide citizens with drugs and 
medical supplies within the subordinate territory; 
  -  4) set up their own budget for health care expenses; 
  -  5) provide sanitary and epidemiological welfare of the public 
and conditions for implementation of State 
sanitary-epidemiological oversight within the subordinate 
territory; define factors having an adverse effect on health, 
inform the public about them, execute measures to eliminate 
them, implement preventive, sanitary-hygienic, epidemic-control 
and environment protecting measures; 
  -  6) coordinate and monitor performance of enterprises, 
institutions and organizations in the State and municipal health 
care systems within the limits of their authority, monitor 
quality of sociomedical aid in the private health care system; 
  -  7) create special-purpose funds for public health care; 
implement measures for mandatory health insurance of citizens; 
  -  8) license medical and pharmaceutical work within the 
subordinate territory at the request of the pertinent subject 
State administrative agency of the Russian Federation 
  -  9) protect the environment and provide ecological safety; 
eradicate consequences of disasters and natural calamities; 
  -  10) develop and provide for the work of institutions dealing 
with rehabilitation of the disabled and individuals with mental 
disorders, organize their training, professional retraining and 
job placement, develop specialized enterprises, shops and other 
forms of organization of industry for these population groups, 
as well as special institutions for patients with incurable 
diseases; 
  -  11) inform the public regularly, including use of mass media, 
about the incidence of socially significant diseases and 
diseases presenting a danger to others; 
  -  12) implement measures to protect families, mothers, fathers 
and children; sanitary and hygienic education of the 
public. 

<H3>    Section III. Organization of Public Health Care in the 
Russian Federation 
Article 9. Authority of highest Russian Federation 
State executive and administrative agencies in the field of 
public health care </H3>

  The Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation defines the 
main 
directions of federal State policy in the field of public health 
care, passes laws and approves federal programs on matters of 
public health care, approves the Russian Federation republic 
budget, including the section on health care expenses, and 
monitors its implementation. 
  The president of the Russian Federation supervises 
implementation of the federal State policy in the field of 
public health care; at least once a year, he submits to the 
Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation a report on State 
policy in the field of public health care and health status of 
the people in the Russian Federation. 
  The Russian Federation Government implements federal State 
policy in the field of public health care, develops, approves 
and finances federal programs for development of health care; 
coordinates in the field of public health care the work of State 
administrative agencies, as well as enterprises, institutions 
and organizations, regardless of nature of ownership, within 
limits stipulated in the legislation. 
Article 10. Public health care funding 
  The following are sources of financing public health care: 
--1) funds from budgets on all levels; --2) funds forwarded for 
mandatory and voluntary health insurance in accordance with the 
Law of the Russian Federation "On Health Insurance for Citizens 
in the Russian Federation"; --3) funds from special-purpose 
funds earmarked for public health care; --4) funds from State 
and municipal enterprises, organizations and other business 
entities, social associations; --5) income from securities; --6) 
credit from banks and other creditors; --7) non-returnable 
and/or charitable contributions and donations; --8) other 
sources that are not prohibited by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 11. Sanitary-epidemiological welfare of the 
public 
  Sanitary and epidemiological welfare is provided by 
implementation of hygienic and epidemic-control measures, 
adherence to sanitary rules and standards, and hygienic 
standards by State agencies, enterprises, institutions, 
organizations, public associations and citizens, by means of the 
system of State sanitary and epidemiological oversight, as well 
as a set of other organizational, legal and economic measures, 
in accordance with sanitary legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 12. State health care system 
  The State health care system refers to the Russian 
Federation 
Ministry of Health, health ministries of republics in the 
Russian Federation, health care administrative agencies of 
autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of 
Moscow and St. Petersburg, Russian Academy of Medical Sciences, 
Russian Federation State committee for sanitary and 
epidemiological oversight, which plan and implement steps to 
execute the Russian Federation State policy in the field of 
health care and for development of medical science, within the 
limits of their competence. 
  The State health care system also includes 
medical-preventive 
[therapeutic and preventive care] institutions, research 
institutions, educational institutions, pharmaceutical 
enterprises and organizations, pharmacies, preventive sanitary 
institutions, institutions of forensic medical expertise, 
services of material and technical support, enterprises that 
manufacture medical agents and equipment, and other enterprises, 
institutions and organizations, which are State property or 
subordinated to administrative agencies of the State health care 
system. 
  The State health care system includes medical-preventive 
institutions, pharmaceutical enterprises and organizations, and 
pharmacies, which are established, by ministries, departments, 
State enterprises, institutions of the Russian Federation apart 
from the Russian Federation Ministry of Health, and health 
ministries of republics in the Russian Federation. Regardless of 
subordination, enterprises, institutions and organizations in 
the State health care system are juridical entities and perform 
their duties in accordance with these Fundamentals, other 
legislative acts of the Russian Federation and republics in the 
Russian Federation, legal acts of autonomous oblasts, autonomous 
okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg, as 
enforceable enactments of the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Health, health ministries of republics in the Russian 
Federation, health care administrative agencies of autonomous 
oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and 
St. Petersburg. 
Article 13. Municipal health care system 
  Municipal health care systems comprise municipal health care 
administrative agencies and municipality-owned 
medical-preventive and research institutions, pharmaceutical 
enterprises and organizations, pharmacies, institutions of 
forensic medical expertise, educational institutions, which are 
juridical entities and perform their work in accordance with 
these Fundamentals, other legal acts of the Russian Federation, 
republics of the Russian Federation, autonomous oblasts, 
autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg, enforceable enactments of the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Health, health ministries of republics of the 
Russian Federation, and local self-government agencies. 
  Municipal health care administrative agencies are 
responsible 
for sanitary and hygienic education of the public, providing a 
guaranteed volume of sociomedical aid accessible to the public, 
development of municipal health care system within the 
subordinate territory, monitor quality of sociomedical aid and 
supply of drugs by enterprises, institutions and organizations 
of the State and municipal private health care system, as well 
as individuals in private medical practice. 
  Enterprises, institutions and organizations of municipal 
health care systems are funded by budgets on all levels, 
special-purpose funds earmarked for public health care, and 
other sources that are not prohibited by legislation of the 
Russian Federation. 
Article 14. Private health care system 
  The private health care system includes medical-preventive 
and pharmaceutical institutions which are private property, as 
well as individuals engaged in private medical practice and 
private pharmaceutical business. 
  The private health care system includes medical-preventive, 
pharmacy, and research institutions, educational institutions 
created and financed by private enterprises, institutions and 
organizations, publicassociations, as well as persons. 
  The work of institutions in the private health care system 
is 
performed in accordance with these Fundamentals, other legal 
acts of the Russian Federation, republics of the Russian 
Federation, autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, 
oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg, enforceable 
enactments of the Russian Federation Ministry of Health, health 
ministries of republics of the Russian Federation, and local 
self-government agencies. 
Article 15. Procedures and conditions of issuing 
licenses to enterprises, institutions and organizations in 
State, municipal, and private health care systems 
  Enterprises, institutions and organizations in State, 
municipal and private health care systems can carry on their 
work only if they are licensed for their chosen type of work. 
  Enterprises, institutions and organizations in State, 
municipal and private health care systems are licensed on the 
basis of a certificate indicating that the conditions under 
which they operate conform to established standards. In cases 
where several medical specialties are involved, each specialty 
is listed separately on the license. 
  These licenses and certificates are issued by licensing 
commissions set up by the subject State administrative agency of 
the Russian Federation, or local administration at the request 
of the pertinent subject State administrative agency of the 
Russian Federation. The licensing commissions consist of 
representatives of the subject State administrative agency of 
the Russian Federation, or local administration, health care 
administrative agencies, professional medical and pharmaceutical 
associations. Licensing commissions are responsible for the 
validity of their decisions. 
  If the operating conditions at enterprises, institutions and 
organizations in State, municipal or private health care systems 
do not conform to the established standards, a license and 
certificate are not issued. Also, the licensing commissions can 
define the allowable types of work or they can schedule 
relicensing. 
  Unscheduled licensing is allowed at the initiative of health 
care administrative agencies, medical-preventive institutions, 
pharmacies, pharmaceutical enterprises and organizations, 
professional medical and pharmaceutical associations. 
  Licenses can be revoked or suspended by licensing 
commissions 
if enterprises, institutions and organizations fail to meet 
requirements and quality standards of medical care. A complaint 
against the decision of a licensing commission may be filed in 
court by officials of enterprises, institutions and 
organizations. 
  The procedure and conditions of issuing licenses to 
enterprises, institutions and organizations of State, municipal 
and private health care systems are established by the Russian 
Federation Government. 
Article 16. Committees (commissions) for ethics in 
the field of public health care 
  Public health ethics committees (commissions) may be set up 
under State executive and administrative agencies, enterprises, 
institutions, organizations in the State or municipal health 
care system to protect the rights of the individual and those of 
different population groups in this field, to participate in 
elaboration of medical ethics standards and resolve problems 
related to infractions thereof, in preparation of 
recommendations on priority directions of clinical and research 
work, to solve other problems in the field of public health care. 
  Ethics committees (commissions) for health care matters 
consist of individuals representing the interests of the 
community, including specialists in medical ethics, jurists, 
scientists and artists, representatives of the clergy, 
professional medical associations, professional unions and other 
public associations. 
  The statute on procedure for setting up and running health 
care ethics committees (commissions) is approved by the Supreme 
Soviet of the Russian Federation. 
<H3>  Section IV. Citizen Rights in the Field of Health Care 
Article 17. Rights of Russian Federation citizens to 
health care </H3>
  Citizens of the Russian Federation have the inalienable 
right 
to health care. This right is provided by protecting the 
environment, providing beneficial working, living, recreational, 
rearing and educational conditions for citizens, by means of 
producing and marketing quality foodstuffs, as well as offering 
accessible sociomedical aid to the public. 
  The State provides health care for citizens, regardless of 
sex, race, nationality, language, social status, occupation, 
place of residence, attitude toward religion, convictions, 
membership in public associations, as well as other 
circumstances. 
  The State guarantees protection of citizens against all 
forms 
of discrimination because of any illness. Persons guilty of such 
discrimination are liable under the established law. 
  Citizens of the Russian Federation who are abroad, are 
guaranteed the right to health care in accordance with 
international agreements of the Russian Federation. 
Article 18. Right of foreign citizens, stateless 
individuals and refugees to health care 
  Foreign citizens residing on Russian Federation soil are 
guaranteed the right to health care in accordance with 
international agreements of the Russian Federation. 
  Stateless individuals who are permanent residents of the 
Russian Federation and refugees enjoy the right to health care 
equal to that of citizens of the Russian Federation, unless 
otherwise stipulated in international agreements of the Russian 
Federation. 
  The procedure for rendering medical care to foreign 
citizens, 
stateless individuals and refugees is defined by the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Health and health ministries of republics 
of the Russian Federation. 
Article 19. Citizen right to information about 
factors affecting health 
  Citizens have the right to receive reliable and timely 
information regularly about factors that help safeguard health 
or have a deleterious effect, including information about 
sanitary-epidemiological welfare in the region of their 
residence, sensible diet, industry, work, services and their 
conformity to sanitary standards and rules, other factors. This 
information is provided by local administration through the mass 
media or directly to citizens upon request following procedure 
established by the Russian Federation Government. 
  In the interests of citizen health care, mass media 
advertisement for alcoholic beverages and tobacco products is 
prohibited. Infraction of this standard is subject to liability 
as established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 20. Citizen right to sociomedical aid 
  In case of illness, inability to work and other instances, 
citizens have the right to sociomedical aid, which includes 
preventive, therapeutic, diagnostic, rehabilitation, orthopedic 
prosthetic and dental prosthetic care, as well as social 
services pertaining to care of the sick, incapacitated and 
disabled, including payment of temporary disability benefits. 
  Socio-medical aid is rendered by medical, social workers and 
other specialists in institutions of State, municipal and 
private health care systems, as well institutions in the system 
of social protection of the public. 
  Citizens have the right to free medical care in State and 
municipal health care systems, in accordance with legislation of 
the Russian Federation, republics of the Russian Federation, 
legal acts of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, 
oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  The guaranteed volume of free medical care is provided to 
citizens in accordance with programs of mandatory health 
insurance. 
  Citizens have the right to additional medical and other 
services on the basis of programs of voluntary health insurance, 
as well as resources of enterprises, institutions and 
organizations, their personal resources and other sources that 
are not prohibited by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
  Citizens have the right to preferential terms for 
prostheses, 
orthopedic, corrective items, hearing aids, transportation and 
other special items. The categories of citizens who have this 
right, as well as conditions and procedure for obtaining 
preferential orthopedic- and dental-prosthetic aid are 
determined by the Russian Federation Government. 
  Citizens have the right to obtain expert medical opinions, 
including independent ones that are provided at their personal 
request in specialized institutions in accordance with Article 
53 of these Fundamentals. 
  Children, adolescents, students, invalids and pensioners 
engaged in exercise have the right to free medical supervision. 
  Employed citizens have the right to benefits if they are 
quarantined, when they are sent home from their work by the 
sanitary and epidemiological service due to communicable illness 
of others. If minors or citizens deemed incompetent according to 
procedure established by law are quarantined, benefits are 
issued to one of the parents (or other legal representative) or 
other family member, as established by legislation of the 
Russian Federation. 
  In case of illness, employed citizens have the right to 
three 
days of unpaid leave per year, which is granted at the personal 
request of a citizen without submitting a medical document to 
certify presence of illness. 
Article 21. Health care for citizens engaged in 
different occupations 
  Employees in occupations, industries, enterprises, 
institutions and organizations, the list of which is approved by 
the Russian Federation Government, undergo mandatory examination 
when hired and periodic physical examinations for the purpose of 
protecting health, preventing communicable and occupational 
diseases. 
  A citizen may be deemed temporarily (for a term of no more 
than five years and with the right of subsequent 
recertification) or permanently unfit for reasons of health to 
perform some types of professional work and work related to a 
source of increased hazard. Such a decision is made on the basis 
of expert socio-medical opinion in accordance with the list of 
medical contraindications, and it may be appealed in court. 
  The list of medical contra-indications for some types of 
professional work and work related to a source of increased 
hazard is established by the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Health and revised at least once every five years. 
  Employers are responsible for allocating funds for mandatory 
and periodic physical examinations for blue- and white-collar 
workers in cases and order stipulated by legislation of the 
Russian Federation and republics of the Russian Federation. 
<H3>  Section V. Rights of Different Population Groups in the 
Field of Health Care 
Article 22. Family rights </H3>
  The State assumes the responsibility of family health care. 
  Each citizen has the right, when medically indicated, to 
free 
consultations on family planning matters, socially significant 
diseases and diseases presenting a hazard to others, medical and 
psychological aspects of family and marital relations, as well 
as medical genetic, other consultations and examinations in 
institutions of the State or municipal health care system for 
the purpose of preventing possible hereditary diseases in 
offspring. 
  By agreement of all adult family members living together, 
the 
family has the right to choose a family physician who provides 
it with medical care determined by its residence. 
  Families with children (first of all, incomplete ones 
rearing 
incapacitated children and children left without parental care) 
have the right to preferential treatment in the field of public 
health care as established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation, republics of the Russian Federation, and legal acts 
of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities 
of Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  In the interests of a child's treatment, at the parents' 
discretion, one of the parents or another family member is 
granted the right to remain in a hospital with the child 
throughout his hospitalization, regardless of the child's age. A 
medical certificate [excuse from work] is issued by the State or 
municipal health care system to an individual who stays with a 
hospitalized child. 
  Benefits are paid in the case of quarantine to care for a 
sick child up to seven years old to one of the parents (or other 
legal representative) or other family member for the entire 
duration of quarantine, out-patient treatment or hospital stay 
with the child, whereas benefits to care for a sick child over 
the age of seven years are paid for a period not exceeding 15 
days if a longer term is not required for medical reasons. 
Article 23. Rights of pregnant women and mothers 
  The State gives the right to work to pregnant women under 
conditions conforming to their physiological distinctions and 
health. 
  Each woman is provided with specialized medical care during 
pregnancy, during and after parturition at an institute of the 
State or municipal health care system at the expense of 
special-purpose funds earmarked for public health care, as well 
as other sources that are not prohibited by legislation of the 
Russian Federation. 
  During pregnancy and in connection with the birth of a 
child, 
as well as during care of sick children up to 15 years old, 
women have the right to benefits and paid leave following 
procedure established by law. 
  The guaranteed term of paid maternity leave is determined by 
legislation of the Russian Federation. The leave may be extended 
in accordance with legislative acts of republics of the Russian 
Federation, and legal acts of autonomous oblasts, autonomous 
okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  The State guarantees appropriate nutrition, including cases 
where there is a need for supplying food through special food 
centers and stores topregnant women, nursing mothers, as well as 
infants up to three years old, when ordered by physicians in 
accordance with procedure established by the Russian Federation 
Government, and governments of republics of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 24. Rights of minors 
  In the interests of safeguarding health, minors have the 
right to: 
1) clinical observation and treatment by child and adolescent 
services following the procedure established by the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Health, and health ministries of 
republics of the Russian Federation; 
2) sociomedical aid and nutrition on preferential terms 
established by the Russian Federation Government funded by 
budgets on all levels; 
3) sanitary-hygienic education, schooling and work under 
conditions conforming to their physiological distinctions and 
health, and precluding their exposure to deleterious factors; 
4) free medical consultations funded by budgets on all levels 
for determination of fitness for work; 
5) receive necessary information about their health in terms 
they can understand. 
  Minors over 15 years old have the right to give their 
voluntary informed consent to medical interventions or to refuse 
them in accordance with articles 32, 33 and 34 of these 
Fundamentals. 
  At the request of parents or their substitutes, minors with 
physical or mental defects may be confined in institutions of 
the social protection system funded by budgets on all levels, 
charitable and other foundations, as well as resources of the 
parents or their substitutes. 
Article 25. Rights of military personnel, citizens 
subject to the draft and enlistees 
  Military personnel have the right to medical certification 
of 
fitness for military service and early dismissal from military 
service on the basis of conclusions of a military medical 
commission. 
  Citizens subject to the draft and enlistees [refers to those 
who join up voluntarily] undergo medical certification and have 
the right to obtain full information about medical 
contraindications to military service and indications for 
deferral or excuse from the draft for military service for 
health reasons. 
  In the event of disagreement with the conclusion of a 
military medical commission, military personnel, citizens 
subject to the draft and enlistees have the right to obtain an 
independent expert medical opinion in accordance with Article 53 
of these Fundamentals and/or appeal the conclusions of the 
military medical commissions in legal form. 
  Military personnel, citizens subject to the draft and 
enlistees have the right to medical care in institutions of the 
State or municipal health care systems. 
  The procedure for organizing medical care of military 
personnel is established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation, enforceable enactments of the Russian Federation 
Ministry of Defense and other ministries, State committees and 
departments in which military service is stipulated by law. The 
work of medical commissions of military commissariats is 
implemented and funded by the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Defense and other ministries, State commissions and departments, 
in which military service is stipulated by law. 
Article 26. Rights of the elderly 
  Elderly citizens (who have reached the age established by 
legislation of the Russian Federation for receipt of an old-age 
pension) have the right to sociomedical aid at home, in 
institutions of the State or municipal health care system, as 
well as institutions of the system of social protection of the 
public, and to receive drugs, including some on preferential 
terms. Socio-medical aid to the elderly, including single 
elderly people and members of families consisting only of 
pensioners, is directed toward treating existing diseases and 
providing care, maintenance of active life and social protection 
in the event of illness and inability to take care of their 
essential needs. 
  Elderly citizens have the right, on the basis of a medical 
conclusion, to sanatorium, resort and rehabilitation therapy 
free of charge or on preferential terms at the expense of funds 
in social insurance, social protection agencies, and by 
enterprises, institutions and organizations with their consent. 
Article 27. Rights of invalids 
  Invalids, including children and those who are disabled 
since 
childhood, have the right to socio-medical aid, rehabilitation, 
supply of drugs, prosthesis, orthopedic prosthetic items, 
transportation on preferential terms, as well as vocational 
training and retraining. 
  Invalids who are unfit for work have the right to free 
sociomedical aid in institutions of the State or municipal 
health care system, care in the home and, if they are unable to 
take care of their essential needs, to care in institutions of 
the system of social protection of the public. 
  The procedure for rendering sociomedical aid to the disabled 
and list of preferential benefits for them are determined by 
legislation of the Russian Federation and republics of the 
Russian Federation. Agencies of the State, autonomous oblasts, 
autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg can establish additional benefits for the disabled 
within the limits of their competence. 
  One of the employed parents or individuals replacing them 
are 
granted four additional paid days of leave per month, which can 
be used by one of the above-mentioned individuals or shared 
among them at their discretion, in order to care for disabled 
children or those disabled since childhood up to the age of 18 
years. 
Article 28. Rights of citizens in emergency 
situations and regions with ecological problems 
  Citizens who have suffered because an emergency situation 
have the right to free medical care, sanatorium, resort and 
rehabilitation therapy, hygienic and epidemic-control measures 
to overcome the consequences of the emergency situation and 
lower the risk to their life and health. 
  Citizens of the Russian Federation residing in regions, 
which 
are declared in accordance with legislated procedure to have 
ecological problems, are guaranteed free medical care, 
medical-genetic and other consultations and examinations when 
they get married, as well as sanatorium, resort and 
rehabilitation therapy, drugs, immunobiological agents and 
medical items on preferential terms. 
  Citizens who have been injured when saving people and 
rendering medical care in emergency situations are guaranteed 
free treatment, including sanatorium-resort therapy and all 
forms of rehabilitation, as well as financial compensation 
following procedure established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 29. Rights to medical care of individuals who 
have been detained, taken into custody, incarcerated, or under 
administrative arrest 
  Individuals who are detained, taken into custody, 
incarcerated, or under administrative arrest have the right to 
medical care including, if necessary, care in institutions of 
the State or municipal health care system, which is funded by 
budgets on all levels. 
  Pregnant women, women in labor and in the postpartum period 
have the right to specialized care, including care given in 
maternity homes. Creches with qualified personnel are set up in 
incarceration facilities provided for mothers with infants up to 
the age of one year. It is prohibited to test new diagnostic, 
preventive and therapeutic methods, as well as drugs, carry out 
biomedical experiments on individuals who are detained, taken 
into custody, incarcerated, or under administrative arrest. 
  With respect to incarcerated individuals, the contract for 
voluntary health insurance is not in effect for the duration of 
their sentences. 
  The procedure for organizing medical care of individuals who 
are detained, taken into custody, incarcerated, or under 
administrative arrest is established by legislation of the 
Russian Federation, andenforceable enactments of the Ministry of 
Internal Affairs of the Russian Federation and Health Ministry 
of the Russian Federation. 
<H3>  Section VI. Rights of Citizens When Receiving Sociomedical 
Aid 
Article 30. Patient rights </H3>
  When seeking medical care and receiving it, the patient has 
to right to: 

  -  1) respectful and human attitude on the part of medical 
and service personnel; 
  -  2) choice of a physician, including family and attending 
physician, with consideration of his agreement, as well as 
choice of preventive medical institution in accordance with the 
contracts for mandatory and voluntary health insurance; 
  -  3) examination, treatment and upkeep under conditions 
conforming to sanitary and hygienic requirements; 
  -  4) have a conference of physicians and consultations with 
other 
specialists at his request; 
  -  5) relief from pain related to illness and/or medical 
intervention by available methods and agents; 
  -  6) have information about his seeking medical care, health 
status, diagnosis and other information obtained in the 
examination and treatment kept confidential, in accordance with 
Article 61 of these Fundamentals; 
  -  7) give his voluntary informed consent to medical 
intervention 
in accordance with Article 32 of these Fundamentals; 
  -  8) refuse medical intervention in accordance with Article 33 
of 
these Fundamentals; 
  -  9) receive information about his rights and duties, and his 
condition in accordance with Article 31 of these fundamentals, 
as well as to choose individuals to whom information about his 
condition can be given in the interests of the patient; 
  -  10) receive medical and other services within the limits of 
programs of voluntary health insurance; 
  -  11) payment of damages in accordance with Article 68 of these 
Fundamentals in case his health was harmed when medical care was 
received; 
  -  12) access to a lawyer or other legal representative to 
protect 
his rights; 
  -  13) access to clergy or, when hospitalized, conditions to 
serve 
religious rites, including a separate room if this does not 
disrupt the internal schedule of the hospital. 

    If a patient's rights are violated, he can complain directly 
to the administrator or other official of the medical-preventive 
institution in which he receives medical care, pertinent 
professional medical associations and licensing commissions, or 
in court. 
Article 31. Citizen's right to information about his 
health 
  Every citizen has the right to receive available 
information, 
in terms he can understand, about his health, including 
information about test results, existence of disease, diagnosis 
and prognosis, methods of treatment, risks involved in the 
latter, possible variants of medical interventions, their 
consequences and results of treatment received. 
  Information about his health is given to the citizen or, in 
the case of individuals under the age of 15 and those deemed 
incompetent according to procedure established by law, to their 
legal representatives by the attending physician, department 
chief of a medical-preventive institution or other specialists 
directly involved in examination and treatment. 
  Information about health cannot be given to a citizen 
against 
his will. In cases of a poor prognosis on development of a 
disease, the information should be reported in a tactful way to 
the citizen and his family, provided the citizen has not 
prohibited giving it to them and/or has not appointed someone to 
whom such information should be given. 
  The citizen have the right to view medical documentation 
reflecting his health status and to have consultations about it 
with other specialists. At the citizen's request, he is 
furnished copies of medical records reflecting the condition of 
his health, provided they do not touch upon the interests of a 
third party. 
  The information contained in medical records of a citizen is 
privilegedand can only be furnished without the citizen's 
permission under conditions stipulated in Article 61 of these 
Fundamentals. 
Article 32. Consent to medical intervention 
  Voluntary informed consent of the citizen is a mandatory 
prerequisite of medical intervention. 
  In cases where the citizen's condition does not permit him 
to 
express his wishes and the medical intervention is urgent, the 
question of performing it in the interests of the citizen is 
decided by a conference of physicians and, if it is impossible 
to hold such a conference, by the attending (on-duty) physician 
who subsequently informs officials of the medical-preventive 
institution. 
  Consent for medical intervention on individuals under the 
age 
of 15 years and citizens deemed incompetent according to 
procedure established by law is given by their legal 
representatives after reporting to them the information 
stipulated in the first part of Article 31 of these 
Fundamentals. In the absence of legal representatives, the 
decision on medical intervention is made by a conference of 
physicians and if it is impossible to hold such a conference, by 
the attending (on-duty) physician who subsequently informs 
officials of the medical-preventive institution and legal 
representatives. 
Article 33. Refusal of medical intervention 
  A citizen or his legal representative has the right to 
refuse 
medical intervention or demand that it be stopped, with the 
exception of situations stipulated in Article 34 of these 
Fundamentals. 
  If medical intervention is refused, an explanation of 
possible consequences must be offered, in terms the citizen or 
his legal representative can comprehend. The refusal of medical 
intervention and indication of possible consequences are 
recorded in the medical record and signed by the citizen or his 
legal representative, as well as the health care worker. 
  If parents or other legal representatives of individuals 
under the age of 15 years, deemed incompetent according to 
procedure established by law, refuse medical care necessary to 
save the life of said individuals, the hospital has the right to 
appeal to court to protect the interests of said individuals. 
Article 34. Medical aid without consent of citizens 
  Medical aid (medical certification, hospitalization, 
observation and isolation) without the consent of citizens or 
their legal representatives is permitted for individuals with 
diseases that present a hazard to others, suffering from serious 
mental illness or individuals who have committed socially 
dangerous acts, on the basis and following procedure established 
by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
  The decision to carry out medical certification and 
observation of citizens without their consent or the consent of 
their legal representatives is made by a physician (conference 
of physicians), while the decision for hospitalization of 
citizens without their consent or the consent of their legal 
representations is made by a court. 
  Rendering medical aid without consent of citizens or consent 
of their legal representatives involves epidemic-control 
measures and is regulated by sanitary legislation. 
  Certification and hospitalization of individuals with 
serious 
mental illness is performed without their consent following 
procedure established by the Law of the Russian Federation ``On 
Psychiatric Care and Guarantees of Citizen Rights When 
Rendered.'' 
  As to individuals who have committed socially dangerous 
acts, 
compulsory medical steps can be taken on the basis and following 
procedure established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
<H3>  Section VII. Medical services in family planning and birth 
control 
Article 35. Artificial insemination and embryo 
implants </H3>
  Every adult woman of child-bearing age has the right to 
artificial insemination and embryo implantation. 
  Artificial insemination of a woman and implantation of an 
embryo are performed in institutions licensed for this type of 
activity, with the written permission of the spouse (or a single 
woman). 
  Information about performed artificial insemination and 
embryoimplantation, as well as identity of the donor, is 
privileged. 
  A woman has the right to information about the procedure for 
artificial insemination and embryo implantation, about medical 
and legal aspects of consequences, about results of 
medicogenetic testing, external data and nationality of the 
donor, which is furnished by the physician who performs the 
medical intervention. 
  Illegal performance of artificial insemination and embryo 
implantation are subject to criminal liability as established by 
legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 36. Artificial abortion 
  Every woman has the right to decide independently the 
question of motherhood. Artificial abortions are performed at a 
woman's request within the first 12 weeks of the gestation 
period, when socially indicated within 22 weeks, and any stage 
of pregnancy whenever medically indicated and with the woman's 
consent. 
  Artificial abortions are performed within the limits of 
programs of mandatory health insurance in institutions licensed 
for this type of activity by physicians with special training. 
  The list of medical indications for artificial abortion is 
determined by the Russian Federation Ministry of Health and the 
list of social indications, according to the statute approved by 
the Russian Federation Government. 
  Illegal abortions are subject to criminal liability as 
established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 37. Medical sterilization 
  Medical sterilization, as a special intervention to deprive 
an individual of reproductive capacity or as a method of 
contraception, can be performed only upon written request of a 
citizen at least 35 years old or having at least two children, 
and regardless of age and number of children when medically 
indicated and with the consent of the citizen. 
  The list of medical indications for sterilization is defined 
by the Russian Federation Ministry of Health. 
  Medical sterilization is performed in institutions of the 
State or municipal health care system, which are licensed for 
this form of activity. 
  Illegal medical sterilization is subject to criminal 
liability as established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
<H3>  Section VIII. Guarantees of Sociomedical Aid to Citizens 
Article 38. Primary medico-sanitary aid </H3>
  Primary medicosanitary aid is a form of medical service that 
is basic, available and free to each citizen, and it comprises 
treatment of the most common diseases, as well as trauma, 
poisoning and other emergency conditions; implementation of 
sanitary-hygienic and epidemic-control measures, medical 
prevention of the most important diseases; sanitary-hygienic 
education; implementation of steps to protect families, mothers, 
fathers and children, other measures related to rendering 
medico-sanitary aid to citizens in the area of their residence. 
  Primary medico-sanitary aid is provided by institutions in 
the municipal health care system and sanitary-epidemiological 
service. Institutions of the State and private health care 
systems may also render primary medico-sanitary aid on the basis 
of contracts with health insurance organizations. 
  The scope of primary medico-sanitary aid is determined by 
the 
local administration, in accordance with territorial programs of 
mandatory health insurance. 
  The procedure for rendering primary medicosanitary aid is 
established by administrative agencies of municipal health care 
systems on the basis of enforceable enactments of the Russian 
Federation Ministry of Health, State Committee for Sanitary and 
Epidemiological Oversight of the Russian Federation, health 
ministries of republics of the Russian Federation, legal acts of 
autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of 
Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  Primary medico-sanitary aid is funded by the municipal 
budget, special-purpose funds earmarked for public health care, 
and other sources that are not prohibited by legislation of the 
Russian Federation. 
Article 39. Emergency medical care 
  Emergency medical care is rendered to citizens in conditions 
requiring urgent medical intervention (accidents, trauma, 
poisoning, other states and diseases), it is administered 
immediately by medical-preventive institutions, regardless of 
territorial or administrative subordination and nature of 
ownership, by health care workers, as well as individuals whose 
duty it is to render it as first aid according to law or special 
rule. 
  Emergency medical care is rendered by the special emergency 
medical care service of the State or municipal health care 
system following procedure established by the Russian Federation 
Health Ministry. 
  Emergency medical care is rendered to citizens of the 
Russian 
Federation and other individuals on its territory free of 
charge, and is funded by budgets on all levels. 
  When a citizen's life is threatened, health care workers 
have 
the right to free use of any available form of transportation to 
transport the citizen to the nearest medical-preventive 
institution. If an official or owner of the transportation 
refuses to execute the lawful demand of the health care worker 
for use of the vehicle to transport a victim, they bear 
responsibility as established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 40. Specialized medical care 
  Specialized medical care is rendered to citizens with 
diseases that require special methods of diagnosis, treatment 
and use of complicated medical equipment. 
  Specialized medical care is rendered by specialists at 
medical-preventive institutions who are licensed in their 
specialty. 
  The type, scope and quality standards of specialized medical 
care rendered in institutions of the State or municipal health 
care system are established by the Russian Federation Health 
Ministry, health ministries of republics of the Russian 
Federation. 
  Specialized medical care is funded by budgets on all levels, 
special-purpose funds earmarked for public health care, 
citizens' personal resources and from other sources that are not 
prohibited by legislation of the Russian Federation. The 
different forms of specialized medical care, a list of which is 
defined annually by the Russian Federation Ministry of Health, 
are funded by the State health care system. 
Article 41. Socio-medical care of citizens with 
socially significant diseases 
  Citizens with socially significant diseases, the list of 
which is defined by the Russian Federation Government receive 
sociomedical aid and are provided with clinical observation in 
appropriate medical-preventive institutions free of cost or on 
preferential terms. 
  The types and scope of socio-medical aid provided to 
citizens 
with socially significant diseases are established by the 
Russian Federation Health Ministry together with concerned 
ministries and departments. 
  The list and types of preferential terms in rendering 
sociomedical aid to citizens with socially significant diseases 
are established by the Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation 
and Russian Federation Government, supreme soviets and 
governments of republics of the Russian Federation, state and 
administrative agencies of autonomous oblasts, autonomous 
okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  Sociomedical care of citizens with socially significant 
diseases is funded by budgets on all levels, special-purpose 
funds earmarked for public health care, and other sources that 
are not prohibited by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 42. Sociomedical aid of citizens with 
diseases presenting a hazard to others 
  Socio-medical aid is free for citizens with diseases 
presenting a hazard to others, a list of which is defined by the 
Russian Federation Government, in institutions intended for this 
purpose in the State or municipal health care system. 
  The types and scope of socio-medical aid for citizens with 
diseases presenting a hazard to others are established by the 
Russian Federation Health Ministry and government committee for 
sanitary and epidemiological oversight of the Russian 
Federation, together with concerned ministries and departments. 
  For different categories of citizens with diseases 
presenting 
a hazard to others, jobs are saved for the duration of their 
temporary disability; preferential terms, housing and other 
benefits are provided as defined by the Supreme Soviet of the 
Russian Federation and Russian Federation Government, supreme 
soviets and governments of republics in the Russian Federation, 
state and administrative agencies of autonomous oblasts, 
autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg. 
  Socio-medical aid for citizens with diseases presenting a 
hazard to others is funded by budgets on all levels and other 
sources that are not prohibited by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 43. Procedure for using new preventive, 
diagnostic, therapeutic methods, drugs, immunobiological agents 
and disinfectants, and biomedical research 
  In health care practice, use is made of preventive, 
diagnostic and therapeutic methods, medical equipment, drugs, 
immunobiological agents and disinfectants that are allowed for 
use following procedure established by law. 
  Diagnostic and therapeutic methods, and drugs, which are 
prohibited but under consideration following established 
procedure, may only be used in the interests of curing a patient 
after obtaining his voluntary written consent. 
  Diagnostic and therapeutic methods, and drugs, which are 
prohibited but under consideration following established 
procedure, may be used to cure individuals under 15 years of age 
only if there is an immediate threat to their life and with the 
written consent of their legal representatives. 
  Procedure for using the diagnostic and therapeutic methods, 
drugs, immunobiological agents and disinfectants listed in the 
second and third parts of this article, including those used 
abroad, is established by the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Health or other authorized agencies. 
  Biomedical research is allowed in institutions of the State 
or municipal health care system and must be based on prior 
laboratory experiments. 
  All biomedical research involving man as its object can be 
carried out only after receiving the citizen's written consent. 
A citizen cannot be forced to participate in biomedical research. 
  Upon receiving consent to biomedical research, the citizen 
must be provided with information about the purposes, methods, 
side-effects, possible risk, duration and expected results of 
the study. The citizen has the right to refuse to participate in 
the study at any stage. 
  It is prohibited to publicize information, including use of 
mass media, about preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic methods 
and drugs that have not undergone trials following procedure 
established by law. Failure to abide by this law is subject to 
liability as established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 44. Supplying drugs and medical items, 
immunobiological agents and disinfectants to the public 
  Production and purchase of drugs and medical items are 
provided in accordance with the needs of the public by the 
Russian Federation Government. Quality of drugs, 
immunobiological agents, disinfectants and medical items is 
monitored by the Russian Federation Health Ministry or other 
authorized ministries and departments. 
  The categories of citizens supplied with drugs and medical 
items for personal use on preferential terms are established by 
the Russian Federation Government and governments of republics 
of the Russian Federation. Attending physicians in the State, 
municipal and private health care systems have the right to 
write prescriptions for drugs on preferential terms. 
Article 45. Prohibition of euthanasia 
  It is forbidden for health care workers to practice 
euthanasia, i.e., to grant a patient's wish to speed his death 
by any action or means, including interruption of artificial 
life-support measures. 
  An individual who deliberately suggests euthanasia to a 
patient and/or carries out euthanasia is subject to criminal 
liability in accordance with legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 46. Definition of death 
  A health care worker (physician or feldsher) determines the 
occurrence of death. 
  The criteria and procedure for determination of the time of 
death, and cessation of resuscitation measures are established 
by statute approved by the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Health, in coordination with the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Justice, and health care ministries of republics in the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 47. Removal of human organs and/or tissues 
for transplantation purposes 
  Removal of human organs and/or tissues for transplantation 
is 
allowed in accordance with legislation of the Russian Federation. 
  Human organs and/or tissues may not be subject to purchase, 
sale or commercial deals. 
  Compulsory removal of human organs and/or tissues for 
transplantation is prohibited. 
  Individuals involved in the said commercial deals, purchase 
and sale of human organs and/or tissues are subject to criminal 
liability in accordance with legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 48. Conduct of autopsies 
  Autopsies are performed by physicians in order to gain 
information about cause of death and diagnosis of illness. 
  The procedure for conducting autopsies is determined by the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Health. 
  In the absence of suspicion of violent death, an autopsy is 
not conducted when there are religious or other grounds, if 
there is a written request by family members, close relatives or 
legal representative of the decedent, or if the decedent had 
expressed his wishes prior to death, unless otherwise stipulated 
in legislation of the Russian Federation. 
  The conclusion as to cause of death and diagnosis of illness 
is issued to family members and, in their absence, close 
relatives or legal representative of the decedent, as well as to 
legal protection agencies at their request. 
  Family members, close relatives or a legal representative of 
the decedent have the right to request a pertinent specialist 
who would agree to participate in the autopsy. An independent 
medical opinion may be obtained, following procedure stipulated 
in Article 53 of these Fundamentals, upon request of family 
members, close relatives, or legal representative of the 
decedent. 
<H3>  Section IX. Expert Medical Opinions 
Article 49. Expert opinion on temporary inability to 
work </H3>
  An expert opinion is provided, following procedure 
established by legislation of the Russian Federation, on 
inability to work due to illness, injury, pregnancy, 
parturition, care of sick family member, need for prostheses, 
sanatorium and resort therapy, and in other instances. 
  Expert determination of temporary inability to work is made 
by attending physicians in State, municipal and private health 
care systems, who personally issue disability certificates to 
citizens for up to 30 days, whereas for longer terms the 
disability certificates are issued by a medical commission 
appointed by the administrator of the medical institution. 
  In forming an expert opinion of temporary inability to work, 
determination is made of the need and duration of temporary or 
permanent transfer of the worker to another job for health 
reasons, and a decision is made about referral of the citizen, 
following established procedure, to a sociomedical commission, 
including cases when this citizen has signs of being disabled. 
  When writing up the disability certificate, in order to 
adhere to medical privilege, information about diagnosis is 
entered with the consent of the patient, otherwise only the 
cause of inability to work is given (illness, trauma or other 
reason). 
  In some cases, by decision of local health care 
administrative agencies, a midlevel health care worker may be 
asked to provide an expert opinion about inability to work in 
institutions of the State or municipal health care system. 
Article 50. Sociomedical expert opinion 
  An expert sociomedical opinion establishes the cause and 
classificaiton group of disability, extent of loss of ability to 
work of citizens, determines the types, scope and duration of 
rehabilitation and social protection measures, offers 
recommendations on employment. Expert sociomedical opinions are 
issued by institutions of sociomedical expertise in the system 
of social protection of the public. 
  It is mandatory for management of enterprises, institutions 
and organizations, regardless of nature of ownership, to follow 
expert sociomedical recommendations on citizen employment. 
  The procedure for organizing and providing an expert 
sociomedical opinion is established by legislation of the 
Russian Federation. 
  The citizen or his legal representative has the right to ask 
a specialist to participate, provided the latter agrees, in 
forming an expert sociomedical opinion. 
  The conclusion of the institution that obtains an expert 
sociomedical opinion can be appealed in court by the citizen 
himself or his legal representative following procedure 
established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 51. Expert military-medical opinion 
  Military medical experts determine physical fitness for 
military service of citizens subject to the draft, enlistees, 
and reserves of the Armed Forces of the Russian Federation, 
federal State Security agencies and Border Troops of the Russian 
Federation, and military personnel; for military personnel (and 
mobilized citizens) and those discharged from military service, 
they determine whether illness, wounds or trauma are related to 
military service (mobilization), determine types, scope and 
duration of socio-medical care of military personnel and their 
rehabilitation. 
  The procedure for organizing and providing expert military 
medical opinions, as well as health requirements for citizens 
subject to the draft, enlistees and military personnel are 
established by the Russian Federation Government. 
  Conclusions expressed in the expert military medical opinion 
are mandatory as to execution by officials on the territory of 
the Russian Federation. 
  Citizens have the right to obtain an independent military 
medical opinion following procedure stipulated in Article 53 of 
these Fundamentals. 
  The conclusion of the institution that obtains an expert 
sociomedical opinion can be appealed in court by the citizen 
himself or his legal representative following procedure 
established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 52. Forensic medical and forensic psychiatric 
expert opinions 
  An expert forensic medical opinion is obtained in medical 
institutions of the State or municipal health care system, 
formed by an expert in the office of forensic medical expertise 
or, in his absence, by a physician called upon to give an expert 
opinion, on the basis of orders from the individuals carrying 
out the investigation, investigator, prosecutor, or court order. 
  An expert forensic psychiatric opinion is obtained in 
institutions of the State or municipal health care system 
designated for this purpose. 
  The citizen or his legal representative has the right to 
submit a petition to the agency that ordered the forensic 
medical or forensic psychiatric expert opinion for inclusion in 
the commission of experts of an additional specialist in the 
appropriate field, with consent of the latter. 
  The procedure for organizing and providing expert forensic 
medical and forensic psychiatric opinions is established by 
legislation of the Russian Federation. 
  The conclusions of institutions providing expert forensic 
medical and forensic psychiatric opinions may be appealed 
following procedure established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 53. Independent expert medical opinion 
  If citizens disagree with the expert medical conclusion, an 
independent expert medical opinion is obtained upon their 
request in the appropriate form, as stipulated in articles 43 
and 41 of these Fundamentals. 
  An expert opinion is deemed independent when the expert or 
commission members who prepare it are not related either through 
work or other factor to the institution or commission that 
provided the expert medical opinion, as well as agencies, 
institutions, officials and individuals concerned with the 
results of independent expertise. 
  The statute on independent expert medical opinions is 
approved by the Russian Federation Government. 
  Citizens have the right to choose the expert institution and 
experts toprovide an independent expert medical opinion. In case 
of dispute, the final decision as to conclusion of the medical 
experts is made by a court. 
<H3>  Section X. Rights and Social Protection of Medical and 
Pharmaceutical Personnel 
Article 54. Right to engage in health care and 
pharmaceutical work </H3>
  Individuals with higher or secondary medical and 
pharmaceutical education in the Russian Federation, those with 
diplomas and special title have the right to engage in health 
care and pharmaceutical work in the Russian Federation, and 
those with a specialist certificate and license have the right 
to engage in specific types of work, the list of which is 
established by the Russian Federation Ministry of Health. 
  A specialist certificate is issued on the basis of 
postgraduate professional education (internship, residency) or 
additional education (advanced training, specialization), or 
testing on theory and practice of chosen specialty, questions of 
legislation in the field of public health care, by commissions 
of professional medical and pharmaceutical associations. 
  During the period of instruction in institutions of the 
State 
or municipal health care system, physicians have the right to 
work in said institutions under the supervision of medical 
personnel responsible for their professional training. Students 
of higher and secondary medical educational institutions are 
allowed to participate in rendering medical care to citizens in 
accordance with instruction programs under the supervision of 
medical personnel responsible for their professional training 
following procedure established by the Russian Federation Health 
Ministry. 
  Individuals who have not completed higher medical or 
pharmaceutical education may be allowed to engage in medical or 
pharmaceutical work in the capacity of personnel with secondary 
medical education following procedure established by the Russian 
Federation Health Ministry. 
  Physicians or pharmacists who have not worked in their 
special field for more than five years may be allowed to 
practice medicine or perform pharmaceutical work after 
retraining in appropriate educational institutions, or on the 
basis of testing carried out by commissions of professional 
medical and pharmaceutical associations. 
  Personnel with secondary medical or pharmaceutical education 
who have not worked in their special field for more than five 
years may be allowed to engage in medical or pharmaceutical work 
after confirmation of their qualifications in appropriate 
institutions of the State or municipal health care system, or on 
the basis of testing carried out by commissions of professional 
medical and pharmaceutical associations. 
  Individuals who received their medical and pharmaceutical 
training in foreign nations are allowed to engage in health care 
or pharmaceutical work after examination in appropriate 
educational institutions of the Russian Federation, following 
procedure established by the Russian Federation Government, as 
well as after receiving licenses to perform the types of work 
stipulated by the Russian Federation Ministry of Health, unless 
otherwise provided by international agreements of the Russian 
Federation. 
  Individuals illegally engaged in medical or pharmaceutical 
work bear criminal liability in accordance with legislation of 
the Russian Federation. 
Article 55. Procedure and conditions of issuing 
licenses for specific types of medical and pharmaceutical work 
  Licenses for specific forms of medical and pharmaceutical 
work are issued to individuals by licensing commissions set up 
by the subject State administrative agency of the Russian 
Federation, or local administration at the request of the 
relevant subject State administrative agency of the Russian 
Federation. 
  Licensing commissions consist of representatives of health 
care administrative agencies, professional medical and 
pharmaceutical associations, higher medical educational 
institutions and institutions of State and municipal health care 
systems. Licensing commissions bear responsibility for validity 
of their decisions. 
  A license is issued for a specific form of work on the basis 
of a specialist certificate. There is a separate procedure for 
issuing licenses for another type of work. 
  The licenses of individuals engaged in specific types of 
medical and pharmaceutical work may be revoked or suspended by 
licensing commissions or by court decision, in the event that 
the work performed does not conform to established health care 
quality standards or regulations prescribed in these 
Fundamentals. Licenses are reinstated after relicensing upon 
disappearance of grounds for which the license was revoked or 
suspended. The decisions of licensing commissions may be 
appealed in pertinent State agencies and/or court. 
  Procedure and conditions for issuing licenses to individuals 
for specific types of medical and pharmaceutical work are 
established by the Russian Federation Government. 
  The list of types of medical and pharmaceutical work subject 
to licensing is established by the Russian Federation Ministry 
of Health. 
Article 56. Right to engage in private medical 
practice 
  Private medical practice refers to rendering medical 
services 
by health care workers outside institutions of the State and 
municipal health care systems, at the expense of citizens' 
personal funds or funds of enterprises, institutions and 
organizations, including health insurance organizations, in 
accordance with existing contracts. 
  Private medicine is practiced in accordance with these 
Fundamentals and other legislative acts of the Russian 
Federation and republics of the Russian Federation. 
  Individuals who have received a diploma of higher or 
secondary medical education, a specialist's certificate and 
license for the chosen form of work have the right to practice 
private medicine. 
  Permission to practice private medicine is granted by local 
administration in coordination with professional medical 
associations and is in force within its subordinated territory. 
  The quality of medical care is monitored by professional 
medical associations and the local administration. The local 
administration cannot intervene in any other way in the 
activities of individuals who are in private practice, with the 
exception of instances where such intervention is directly 
stipulated by law. 
  The right to private medical practice can be prohibited by 
decision of the agency that granted permission for private 
medical practice or the court. 
Article 57. Right to practice folk medicine (healing) 
  Folk medicine refers to methods of health improvement, 
prevention, diagnosis and treatment based on the experience of 
many generations of people, that have become firmly established 
in folk traditions and are not registered following procedure 
established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
  Citizens of the Russian Federation who have received a 
healer's diploma, which is issued by health ministries of 
republics of the Russian Federation, health care administrative 
agencies of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, krays, 
oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg, have the right to 
engage in folk medicine. 
  The decision to issue a healer's diploma is made on the 
basis 
of a citizen's application and presentation by professional 
medical association, or citizen's application and joint 
presentation by a professional medical association and 
institution licensed for the said type of work. The holder of 
healer's diploma has the right to practice folk medicine on the 
territory subordinated to the health care administrative agency 
that issued the diploma. 
  Individuals who have received a healer's diploma practice 
folk medicine following procedure established by the local 
administration in accordance with Article 56 of these 
Fundamentals. 
  Use of folk medicine methods is permitted in 
medical-preventive institutions in the State or municipal health 
care system by decision of administrators of said institutions, 
in accordance with Article 43 of these Fundamentals. 
  It is prohibited to conduct mass healing sessions, including 
use of mass media. 
  A healer's diploma can be revoked by decision of the health 
care administrative agency that issued said diploma, and said 
action can be appealed in court. 
  The illegal practice of folk medicine (healing) is subject 
to 
administrative liability, and to criminal liability in cases 
stipulated in legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 58. Attending physician 
  The attending physician is the physician who renders medical 
care to a patient during the period of his observation and 
treatment in outpatient-polyclinical or hospital institutions. 
The attending physician may not be a physician undergoing 
training in a higher medical educational institution or 
postgraduate professional training institution. 
  The attending physician is appointed by the choice of the 
patient or administrator of a medical-preventive institution (or 
department thereof). If a patient demands replacement of the 
attending physician, the latter must cooperate in choosing 
another physician. 
  The attending physician organizes timely and qualified 
examination and treatment of the patient, furnishes information 
about his condition, invites consultants and organizes 
conferences of physicians at the request of the patient or his 
legal representative. Consultants' recommendations are followed 
only with consent of the attending physician, with the exception 
of emergency situations presenting a threat to the patient's 
life. 
  The attending physician personally issues disability 
certificates for terms of up to 30 days. 
  In cases where a patient does not follow instructions or 
rules of intramural procedure of the medical-preventive 
institution, the attending physician may, in agreement with the 
appropriate official, refuse to supervise and treat a patient 
provided the patient's life is not in danger and he does not 
present a danger to the health of others. 
  The attending physician bears responsibility for poor 
performance of his professional duties in accordance with 
legislation of the Russian Federation and republics of the 
Russian Federation. 
Article 59. Family physician 
  The family physician is a physician who has undergone 
special 
training in many fields on primary medical and health care of 
family members regardless of their sex and age. 
  The procedure to be followed in the work of a family 
physician is established by the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Health and health ministries of republics of the Russian 
Federation. 
Article 60. Physician's oath 
  Individuals who have graduated from higher medical 
educational institutions and received a physician's diploma take 
the physician's oath. 
  The text of the physician's oath is approved by the Supreme 
Soviet of the Russian Federation. 
  Physicians who break the physician's oath bear liability as 
established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 61. Doctor-patient confidentiality 
  Information about seeking medical care, physical condition 
of 
a citizen, diagnosis of his disease and other information 
obtained from examination and treatment is privileged. The 
patient must have a confirmed guarantee of the confidentiality 
of information he furnishes. 
  For individuals who gain privileged information in training, 
performance of professional, business and other duties, it is 
prohibited to disseminate such information, with the exception 
of cases established in the third and fourth parts of this 
Article. 
  With the consent of a citizen or his legal representative, 
it 
is allowed to transmit privileged information to other citizens, 
including officials, in the interests of examination and 
treatment of the patient to carry out research, publish it in 
the scientific press, to use such information in the educational 
process and for other purposes. 
  It is permitted to furnish privileged information without 
the 
consent of a citizen or his legal representative in the 
following cases: 
1) for the purpose of examination and treatment of a citizen 
unable to express his reasons because of his condition; 
2) in cases of danger of spread of communicable diseases, mass 
scale poisoning and trauma; 
3) at the request of inquiry and investigative agencies, 
prosecutor and court in connection with investigation or court 
hearing; 
4) when rendering care to a minor up to 15 years old, to inform 
his parents or legal representatives; 
5) in the presence of grounds to believe that the citizen was 
injured as a result of illegal acts. 
  Individuals who have received privileged information 
following procedure established by law, along with medical and 
pharmaceutical personnel, with consideration of the harm 
inflicted on a citizen, bear disciplinary, administrative or 
criminal liability for disclosing privileged information, in 
accordance with legislation of the Russian Federation and 
republics of the Russian Federation. 
Article 62. Professional medical and pharmaceutical 
associations 
  Medical and pharmaceutical personnel have the right to 
create 
professional associations and other public associations formed 
on a voluntary basis to protect the rights of medical and 
pharmaceutical workers, develop medical and pharmaceutical 
practice, assist in research, solve other problems related to 
professional work of medical and pharmaceutical personnel. 
  Professional medical and pharmaceutical associations 
participate in: 
1) elaboration of standards of medical ethics, decision of 
issues related to failure to meet said standards; 
2) development of quality standards of medical care, federal 
programs and criteria for training and advanced training of 
medical and pharmaceutical workers, conferment of qualification 
categories to medical and pharmaceutical workers; 
3) licensing medical and pharmaceutical work; 
4) agreements on rates for medical services in the system of 
mandatory health insurance and activity of funds of mandatory 
health insurance. 
  Professional medical and pharmaceutical associations of 
republics of the Russian Federation, autonomous oblasts, 
autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg may conduct tests on medical and pharmaceutical 
workers in theory and practice of their chosen specialty, 
questions of legislation in the field of public health care, and 
issue the appropriate specialist certificate, as well as to 
offer suggestions on conferring qualification categories. 
  Professional medical, pharmaceutical and other social 
associations operate in accordance with legislation of the 
Russian Federation and republics of the Russian Federation. 
Article 63. Social and legal protection of medical 
and pharmaceutical workers 
  Medical and pharmaceutical workers have the right to: 

  -  1) working conditions conforming to labor safety 
requirements; 
  -  2) have a labor agreement (contract) for their work, 
including 
work abroad; 
  -  3) protection of their professional honor and dignity; 
  -  4) obtaining a qualification category consistent with the 
level 
of their theoretical and practical training; 
  -  5) advanced professional training; 
  -  6) retraining funded by budgets on all levels when unable to 
perform professional duties for health reasons, as well as in 
cases of reduction in personnel or liquidation of enterprises, 
institutions and organizations; 
  -  7) insurance for professional mistakes resulting in harm or 
detriment to health unrelated to negligence or carelessness in 
performing their professional duties; 
  -  8) unimpeded and free use of transportation resources 
belonging 
to enterprises, institutions, organizations or citizens, as well 
as any available form of transportation to transport a citizen 
to the nearest medical-preventive institution in 
death-threatening cases; 
  -  9) priority provision of housing, installation of a 
telephone, 
space for their children in preschool and sanatorium-resort 
institutions for children, acquisition on preferential terms of 
a motor vehicle for use in performing professional duties when 
work involves travel and other preferential treatment as 
provided by legislation of the Russian Federation and republics 
of the Russian Federation, legal acts of autonomous oblasts, 
autonomous okrugs, krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg. 

    Physicians, pharmacists, midlevel medical and pharmaceutical 
personnel in the State and municipal health care systems who 
work and reside in rural areas and urban-type settlements, as 
well as family members residing with them, have the right to a 
free apartment with heat and electricity, in accordance with 
existing legislation. 
  The procedure for retraining and advanced training of 
medical 
and pharmaceutical personnel, assigning a qualification category 
is determined in accordance with these Fundamentals by the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Health, health ministries of 
republics of the Russian Federation, jointly with professional 
medical and pharmaceutical associations. 
Article 64. Wages and compensations 
  Medical and pharmaceutical workers, as well as researchers, 
professorial and teaching staff of higher and secondary medical 
and pharmaceutical educational institutions, and medical 
departments of universities are remunerated for their work in 
accordance with their qualifications, tenure and duties they 
perform, as stipulated in the labor agreement (contract). 
  Medical and pharmaceutical workers have the right to 
compensatory payment, as percentage of regular wages, for 
working under deleterious, difficult and hazardous conditions, 
as well as other preferential treatment as stipulated in labor 
legislation of the Russian Federation, republics of the Russian 
Federation, legal acts of autonomous oblasts, autonomous okrugs, 
krays, oblasts, cities of Moscow and St. Petersburg. 
  The list of categories of workers with the right to raises, 
allowances and payments in addition to their wages, as well as 
other forms of compensation and preferential treatment, is 
established by the Russian Federation Government in agreement 
with trade unions. 
  Procedure and conditions for payment of compensations and 
preferential treatment of researchers in the State and municipal 
health care systems, as well as professorial and teaching staff 
of higher and secondary medical ad pharmaceutical educational 
institutions and medical departments of universities conform to 
procedure and conditions for payment of compensations and 
preferential treatment of medical and pharmaceutical workers. 
  Mandatory State personal insurance coverage in the sum of 
120 
times the regular monthly wages is set up for medical, 
pharmaceutical and other workers in the State and municipal 
health care systems, whose work involves a threat to their life 
and health, in accordance with the list of jobs involving a 
threat to life and health of workers that is approved by the 
Russian Federation Government. 
  In the event of harm to the health of medical and 
pharmaceutical workers in the performance of their job or 
professional duties, they are compensated in an amount and 
following procedure established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
  In the event of death of workers in the State and municipal 
health care systems while performing their job or professional 
duties in the course of rendering medical care or carrying out 
research, families of the victims are given a lump-sum grant in 
an amount equal to 120 times the regular monthly wages. 
  The procedure and conditions of issuing lump-sum grants to 
set up housekeeping, as established for specialists who have 
graduated from agricultural educational institutions, extent to 
graduates of medical and pharmaceutical higher and secondary 
educational institutions when they arrive for work in an 
assigned rural medical-preventive institutions. 
<H3>  Section XI. International Collaboration 
Article 65. International collaboration in the field 
of health care of citizens </H3>
  The Russian Federation collaborates with other nations in 
the 
field of public health care on the basis of international 
agreements of the Russian Federation. 
  If rules other than those contained in these Fundamentals 
are 
established in an international agreement of the Russian 
Federation, the rules of the international agreement apply. 
  Agreements made within the framework of international 
collaboration in the field of public health care by health care 
administrative agencies, as well as enterprises, institutions 
and organizations, must not limit human and citizen rights and 
freedoms in the field of health care as stipulated in these 
Fundamentals and other legislative documents of the Russian 
Federation. 
<H3>  Section XII. Liability for Inflicting Harm to Citizens' 
Health 
Article 66. Bases for indemnification if harm is 
inflicted to citizens' health </H3>
  In cases where harm is inflicted to a citizen's health, the 
guilty parties are obliged to indemnify the victims in a sum and 
following procedure established by legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
  If harm to the health of citizens is inflicted by a minor or 
individual deemed incompetent according to procedure established 
by law, liability conforms to legislation of the Russian 
Federation. 
  Harm inflicted to citizens' health as a result of 
environmental pollution is indemnified by the State, juridical 
or physical entity that inflicted the harm, following procedure 
established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 67. Reimbursement of medical expenses of 
citizens who are victims of illegal acts 
  Claims for funds spent on medical care of victims of illegal 
acts are submitted to enterprises, institutions and 
organizations responsible for the inflicted harm to health, 
payable to institutions of the State or municipal health care 
systems who bore the expenses, or to institutions in the private 
health care system, if treatment was rendered in institutions of 
the private health care system. 
  Individuals who acted together in causing harm to citizen 
health bear joint responsibility for indemnification. 
  If harm to the health of citizens is inflicted by minors, 
indemnification is made by their parents or their substitutes, 
and in the case of such harm is inflicted by individuals deemed 
incompetent according to procedure established by law, 
indemnification is effected at the expense of the State in 
accordance with legislation of the Russian Federation. 
  The damage subject to indemnification is determined 
following 
procedure established by legislation of the Russian Federation. 
Article 68. Liability of medical and pharmaceutical 
workers for violation of citizen rights in the field of health 
care 
  If citizen rights in the field of health care are violated 
as 
a result of poor performance of professional duties by medical 
and pharmaceutical workers so as to inflict harm or cause death, 
indemnification is provided in accordance with the first part of 
Article 66 of these Fundamentals. 
  Indemnification does not exempt medical and pharmaceutical 
workers from disciplinary, administrative or criminal liability 
in accordance with legislation of the Russian Federation and 
republics of the Russian Federation. 
Article 69. Citizen right to appeal actions of state 
agencies and officials infringing upon their rights and freedoms 
in the field of health care 
  The actions of State agencies and officials infringing upon 
the rights and freedoms of citizens, as defined in these 
Fundamentals, in the field of health care can be appealed in 
superior State agencies, to superior officials or taken to 
court, in accordance with existing legislation. 

